District of Columbia statutes.
26-322

Authority of Commissioner to issue rules and regulations.

The Superintendent [Commissioner] may promulgate such rules and regulations as deemed necessary and appropriate to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 23, 45 DCR 1792

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-1122.